Utah statutes.
58-9-307.   Supervision of funeral service intern.

(1)  A person seeking licensure as a funeral service intern shall submit as a part of the application for a license:

(a)  the name of the licensed funeral service director who has agreed to supervise all duties performed by the applicant as an intern; and

(b)  the name of the licensed funeral service establishment at which the training and supervision shall take place.

(2)  A licensed funeral service director may supervise only one licensed funeral service intern at one time.

(3) (a)  Within 30 days after the day on which the supervisor-supervisee relationship between a licensed funeral service director and a licensed funeral service intern terminates, the funeral service director shall furnish to the division a report of the performance of the funeral service intern.

(b)  The report shall be in form and content as prescribed by the division.

(4) (a)  A licensed funeral service intern shall notify the division of any change in the intern's supervising funeral service director. 

(b)  The supervising funeral service director shall submit to the division, in accordance with Subsection (3), a report of the funeral service intern's performance.

(5)  The licensed funeral service director is responsible for supervision of all of the duties and functions performed by the funeral service intern throughout the entire internship period.

